Georgia, session 2025_26, HB459.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Heart Health for All Act."
SECTION 2.
The General Assembly finds and declares that:
(1) Cardiovascular disease, which includes ischemic heart disease, stroke, congestive heart
failure, hypertension, and atherosclerosis, is the leading cause of death in Georgia,
impacting residents of all ages, races, and genders;
H. B. 459
- 1 -

LC 52 0743
(2) Black and Hispanic women in Georgia experience disproportionate rates of
cardiovascular disease and cardiovascular morbidity and mortality;
(3) The leading causes of pregnancy related deaths were due to cardiovascular conditions,
and such deaths were largely preventable;
(4) Cardiovascular disease, heart attacks, and negative outcomes from heart attacks, are
increasing in younger generations, particularly Generation Z and millennials;
(5) COVID-19 has been associated with many cardiac complications, including cardiac
injury, ischemic heart disease, and heart failure, and the pandemic amplified risks and
worsened outcomes for individuals with cardiovascular disease; and
(6) Therefore, it is in the best interest of the residents of this state to establish a program
focused on raising public awareness of the importance of cardiovascular health and risk
factors, prevention, and treatment of cardiovascular disease.
SECTION 3.
Chapter 1 of Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general
provisions regarding health, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"31-1-26.
(a) The department shall:
(1) Develop and implement culturally relevant public awareness campaigns state wide
focused on cardiovascular health and the risk factors, prevention, and treatment of
cardiovascular disease. Such campaigns shall target all ages, races, and genders but shall
prioritize high-risk groups such as younger populations, Black and Hispanic
communities, and women;
(2) Partner with elementary and secondary schools, technical schools, colleges and
universities, and local organizations to educate the youth of this state about
cardiovascular health and cardiovascular disease, including recognizing the symptoms
of heart attacks and strokes; and
H. B. 459
- 2 -

LC 52 0743
(3) Develop and distribute educational materials regarding cardiovascular health and
cardiovascular disease through community centers, healthcare providers, and digital
platforms to maximize outreach.
(b) The department shall support efforts to:
(1) Increase and improve research on the prevention, diagnosis, and treatment of
cardiovascular disease, focusing on maternal health and minority populations; and
(2) Assist community health centers in offering free, discounted, or low-cost
cardiovascular screenings and preventive services.
(c) In implementing the provisions under subsection (b) of this Code section, the
department shall give priority to areas with limited healthcare access and higher
cardiovascular disease mortality rates as determined by the department.
(d) No later than June 30, 2026, and annually thereafter, the department shall prepare and
submit a detailed written report on the implementation and effectiveness of the provisions
of this Code section to the Governor and the General Assembly and shall publish such
report on its public website. Such report shall include:
(1) The effectiveness of the public awareness campaigns, partnerships with schools, and
education materials;
(2) The number and demographics of individuals served through cardiovascular
screenings and preventive services;
(3) Data illustrating the progress in reducing cardiovascular disease mortality rates across
all demographics served; and
(4) Any recommendations to improve awareness, prevention, and outcomes of
cardiovascular disease."
SECTION 4.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
H. B. 459
- 3 -

LC 52 0743
SECTION 5.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 459
- 4 -